Massachusetts, session 194th, H2809.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 37b of Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition is hereby amended by inserting after the word “individual” in line 56 the
following:-
“On or after January 1, 2026, any company that administers a retirement plan offered by
a political subdivision of the state to the employees of such political subdivision shall disclose to
each participant in such retirement plan: (1) The fee ratio and return, net of fees, for each
investment under the retirement plan, and (2) the fees paid to any person who, for compensation,
engages in the business of providing investment advice to participants in the retirement plan
either directly or through publications or writings. Such disclosures shall be made upon initial
enrollment in the retirement plan and at least annually thereafter. For the purposes of this section,
"retirement plan" means any retirement plan created in accordance with the provisions of Section
of 2

403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue
code of the United States, as amended from time to time.”
of 2